Utah statutes.
76-10-1005.   Using, destroying, concealing or possessing articles with registered trademark or service mark to deprive owner of use or possession -- Exception.

Every person who, without the consent of the owner of an article bearing the owner's validly registered trademark or service mark, uses, destroys, conceals, or possesses the article or who defaces or otherwise conceals the trademark or service mark upon the article with intent to deprive the owner of the use or possession of the article is guilty of a class B misdemeanor; provided, however, that nothing contained in this part shall be construed to apply to or restrict the transfer or use of wooden boxes or the re-use of burlap or cotton bags or sacks when those bags or sacks have been reversed inside out or the markings thereon have been concealed or obliterated to effectively demonstrate that the products contained therein do not purport to be the products of the owner of the registered trademark or service mark theretofore put upon those bags.

